src/filters/reorder-tags.otw.xfscript
!I'm using totally novel tags in addition to tags from the analyzer
!this could cause confusion ...

!so-called unspecified actor/possession forms aren't treated here, but they really should be

!###
!#minor adjustments
!###

!{ nouns
define nounobv [%+4 -> %+Obv || \[%+3|%+%0] _ .#.] ;
define nounpl  [%+Pl -> %+PL || \[%+1|%+2|%+3|%+%0] _ .#.] ; !+Pl will be deleted when not at the end of the word, but nouns need to escape this (PLPl rule restores +Pl from +PL)
define nounsg [[..] -> ["@R.Animate@" %+Sg|"@D.Animate@"] || \[%+PL|%+Obv|%+Loc] _ .#.];
define nounpos [%+ThmPos -> 0];
!}

!{ verb explicit defaults
define mkind [ [..] -> %+Ind || 
                                [%+VAI|%+VAIO|%+VTA|%+VTI] _ \["@D.Person@"] \[%+Cnj|%+Imp],
                                [%+VII] _ \[%+Cnj]
                                ] ;

define themesplus [ 
                    %+ThmDir| 
                    %+ThmInv "@P.Theme.Inv@"|
                    %+Thm2|
                    %+Thm1Pl|
                    %+Thm1Sg|
                    %+ThmPas|
                    %+Thm1|
                    %+Thm2a
                    ] ;

define mkpos [ [..] -> %+Pos || 
                                [%+ThmNul|%+Thm2b] _ , !cnj order themes that are never followed by +Neg
                                [
                                    %+Cnj %+ThmInv| !vta exception
                                    themesplus| !most vtas
                                    [%+VAI|%+VAIO|%+VTI]["@D.Person@" %+Cnj|%+Ind "@D.Order.Cnj@" ] !basic case
                                ] 
                                _ \[%+Neg] 
                                ] ;

!test rules for inserting +Neu tag
!make sure invisible environment adjustments aren't thrown off
define sdneu [ [..] -> ["@P.NuMode.Neu@" %+Neu|"@N.NuMode.Neu@" "@P.EmptyMode.True@"] || \[%+Imp] [%+Pos|%+Neg] _ ] ;
define rmneu [ [..] -> "@D.NuMode.Neu@" "@C.EmptyMode@" || _ [%+Prt|%+Dub] ] ; 
define rmdum [ [..] -> "@D.EmptyMode@" || _ .#. ] ;

!checking after mode markers for whether marked mode has happened isn't what we want
!it is the case where there is no mode marker (set up to not double-mark mode) that we need to rule out the path
!it might be best to double-mark and then just remove +Neu+Prt-type sequences
!they do have to actually be adjacent then
!define sdneu [ [..] -> ["@P.Mode.Neu@" "@P.MarkedMode.True@" %+Neu|"@N.Mode.Neu@" "@N.MarkedMode.True@"] || \[%+Imp] [%+Pos|%+Neg] _ ] ;
!define rmneu [ [..] -> "@D.Mode.Neu@" "@P.MarkedMode.True@" || _ [%+Prt|%+Dub] ] ; 
!define neuprtdub [ [..] -> "@R.MarkedMode.True@" || [%+Prt|%+Dub|%+Neu] _ ] ; 
!deprecated long distance envi
define mkneu [ [..] -> %+Neu || \[%+Imp] [%+Pos|%+Neg] _ \[%+Prt|%+Dub]* .#.]; !only long distance envi

!  VAI+Cnj 
!  #1	2	3	4
!  #neg	persnum prt     dub
!
!  VII - Cnj
!  #1	2	3	4
!  #neg	obv     prt     dub
!     
!  VTI+Cnj - AM - waabandam :
!  #1	2	3	4
!  #neg	persnum prt     dub
!     
!  VTA+Cnj - AM - waabmaa :
!  #1	    2	    3	    4       5       6
!  #theme    neg     persnum periph  prt     dub
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!  VAI - Ind
!  #1	2	3	4   5
!  #per	neg     num     mod periph
!
!  VII - D - mnopgot :
!  #1	2	3	4
!  #neg	obv     mod     per
!     
!  VTI - AM - waabandam :
!  #1	2	3	4   5
!  #per	neg     num     mod periph
!
!  VTA - AM - waabmaa :
!  #1	    2	    3	    4       5       6       7
!  #per      theme   neg     inan    persnum mod     periph
!}
     
!###
!#person and number 
!#  person and number information appears at end of string in format XY (X=person, Y=number)
!#      Possessor -> PxXY 
!#      Subject (Object) -> XY (XYO)
!###
!{ persnum
!in this section we convert the original Algonquian-style tagging to a less parochial form 
!Algonquian languages afford a rather sparse notation, giving us two main tasks:
!   expand zeroes into appropriate categories
!   shunt categories into their appropriate place as indicated by theme signs (transitives (vti trivial, vta involved))
!One more task:person and number are not realized in the same place natively, and so must be united
!{ number flags
!this section is very early because cnj forms need features to be specified for subject information to be filled out
    !nouns and independent order verbs use a sparse notation where only non-sg is marked
    !number suffixes are particular to person features
    !first and second person number is realized in a different slot than third person number
    !in vtas, vtis we see the consequence of this: there can be two number specifications in a word
    !we therefore distinguish between "Number" and "Periph" flags
!{  seeding number
define sdX      [[..] -> "@P.Person.X@" || _ %+X ]; !vais don't have prefixal passive marking. this departs from only using underlying, never inserting Person.? flags.
    !-> Person.? flags now inserted in other cases (sd1pl, sd2pl), expect to make general (2/1/2017)
!cnj verbs do not have a composite 21pl too...
define sd21     [ %+2 %+1 %+Pl -> "@P.Person.2@" "@P.Number.1Pl@" ] ; !Formerly had 21Pl value for Number. 
!cpsub was adding person tags from number flags (suffixes) when person flags (prefixes) were present
!solution: make person tags only be added from person flags
!   suffixes with no prefixes must be supplied with person flags
!   suffixes with prefixes cannot overwrite person flags (+1+Pl compatible with 1+, 2+)
!I don't think peripheral suffixes had this problem, but we know how to fix it if it arises.

!original
define sd1pl     [[..] -> ["@R.Person@" "@P.Number.1Pl@"|"@U.Person.1@" "@P.Number.1Pl@"]   || _ %+1 %+Pl  ];
define sd2pl     [[..] -> ["@R.Person@" "@P.Number.2Pl@"|"@U.Person.2@" "@P.Number.2Pl@"]   || _ %+2 %+Pl  ];
define sd3pl     [[..] -> "@P.Periph.3Pl@"    || _ %+3 %+Pl  ];
define sd3obv    [[..] -> "@P.Periph.3Obv@"   || _ %+3 %+4    ];
define sdinanpl  [[..] -> "@P.Inanimate.1@" "@P.Periph.InanPl@" || _ %+%0 %+Pl  ];
define sdinansg  [[..] -> "@P.Inanimate.1@" "@P.Periph.InanSg@" || _ %+%0 \[%+Pl]  ];
!cnj order verbs explicitly write out sg, so these rules have limited applicability
                !(only third persons may participate with 21pl, 2 @1Pl is always 21pl, never 2sg v 1pl (well, such forms occur, but 2 number is ambiguous btw sg and pl then :D).)
!for consistency, these could also get the Person-number schism seen in sd1pl, sd2pl
!   it is a question of simple cpsub or simple sd rules
define sd1      [ [..]  -> "@P.Person.1@" || _ %+1 \[%+Pl]] ;
define sd2      [ [..]  -> "@P.Person.2@" || _ %+2 \[%+Pl]] ;
define sd3      [ [..]  -> "@P.Periph.3Sg@" || _ %+3 [.#.|\[%+Pl|%+4]]] ; 
!} num seed end

!} num flag end

!{ vais, viis, nouns
!following rules solve a problem
!two arg rules follow one arg rules (for vais, viis, nouns)
!but if they all target _ .#., then two arg rules cover up word boundary, which makes clean-up section remove person information for one arg words
!this gives overt material to craft more specific environments [[+ONE|+TWO] +ARGSLOT .#.]
define argcount [ [..] -> "@P.Args.1@" || _ [%+VII|%+VAI|%+NA|%+NI|%+NAD|%+NID] ,,
                    [..] -> "@P.Args.2@" || _ [%+VTI|%+VTA]] ; !vaio...

define onetwo [ [..] -> [
                            "@R.Args.1@" %+ONE|
                            "@R.Args.2@" %+TWO|
                            "@D.Args@"
                        ] 
                        || _ .#. ] ;

define argslot [ [..] -> %+ARGSLOT || [%+ONE|%+TWO] _ .#. ] ;

!copy subject
!this rule too promiscuous: proliferation of flags means that 3Pl possessed forms (which have a 2Pl flag) end up also generating a 2Pl abstract tag
!perhaps only fill in +1 with @Person.1@ flag
define cpsub [%+ARGSLOT -> [
                        [
                            "@R.Person.1@" !|
                            !"@R.Number.1Sg@" !cnj
                            ] %+1 |
                        [
                            "@R.Person.2@" !|
                            !"@R.Number.21Pl@"|  !cnj (necessary? 1pl could work...)
                            !"@R.Number.2Sg@"  !cnj 
                            ] %+2 |
                        [
                            "@R.Person.3@" "@D.Periph.3Obv@"| !stopping 3...3+4 from parasitically inserting +3 when it should only insert +4 (see +4 insertion below in this rule) 
                            "@R.Periph.3Pl@"|
                            "@R.Periph.3Sg@"
                            ] %+3 |
                        [
                            "@R.Periph.InanPl@"|
                            "@R.Periph.InanSg@"
                            ] %+%0 |
                        "@R.Periph.3Obv@" %+4 | 
                        "@R.Person.X@" %+X | 
                        !passives (X) should be covered now
                        "@R.Animate@" "@D.Person@" !no arguments (noun pos opt)
                        ]
                        || %+ONE _ .#. ];

!} vai, vii, noun end

!{ vtis
!seed theme
define sdthminan [[..] -> "@P.Theme.Inan@" || _ %+VTI ] ;

!move theme
!theme requirements being introduced only in this envi
!allows non-theme words (vai, vii, nouns) to surface
define mvthminan [ %+ARGSLOT -> 
                    [
                        "@R.Theme.Inan@" %+ThmInan |
                        "@D.Theme.Inan@" %+ARGSLOT
                    ]
                        || %+TWO _ .#. ] ;

!supply object
define objinan [[..] -> %+%0 "^X$" || %+ThmInan _ ] ;

!copy subject
define subvti [[..] -> [
                        [
                            "@R.Person.1@" !|
                            !"@R.Number.1Sg@" !cnj
                            ] %+1 |
                        [
                            "@R.Person.2@" !|
                            !"@R.Number.21Pl@"|  !cnj (necessary? 1pl could work...)
                            !"@R.Number.2Sg@"  !cnj 
                            ] %+2 |
                        [
                            "@R.Person.3@"|
                            "@R.Periph.3Pl@"|
                            "@R.Periph.3Sg@"
                            ] %+3 |
                        "@R.Periph.3Obv@" %+4 
                        ]
                        || _ %+ThmInan ];

!} vti end

!{ vtas  

!{ theme movement 
    !the main strategy is to use the theme sign as the locus of argument realization
    !because arguments are spelled out at the end of the string in our notation, we move theme signs to the end here
    !movement is really copying and deletion :D
    !to spare ourselves long-distance environments (these cause explosive growth), we use memory to control movement

!a crazy rule (for if a suspected typo in valentine 2001 turns up not a typo)
!define thminvc      [ %+Cnj %+ThmInv %+Neg %+2 %+Pl %+3 .#. -> %+Cnj %+Neg %+2Pl% %+Thm %+3Sg .#. ];

!{ seeding theme features
    !by converting tags to flags (invisible characters), we save needing to write a deletion rule
!{ cnj theme seed
define sdcnjthm1   [%+Thm1 -> "@P.Theme.1@" ]; 
define sdcnjthm2a  [%+Thm2a -> "@P.Theme.2a@"];  
define sdcnjthm2b  [%+Thm2b -> "@P.Theme.2b@"]; 
define sdcnjthmNul [%+ThmNul -> "@P.Theme.Nul@"];  
!cnj themes that double as ind themes
!define sdcnjaanul [%+ThmDir ->  "@P.Theme.Nul@" || %+Cnj _ (%+Neg) \["@P.Periph.3Sg@"|"@P.Periph.3Pl@"] ]; !attempts to route non 3v3 (1v3, 2v3) aa to null, but probably routes all of them. Let this be a warning to those who would use invisible characters in rule environments.
define sdcnjdouble [%+ThmInv -> "@P.Theme.InvC@",
                    %+Thm1Pl -> "@P.Theme.1PlC@", !Thm1Pl is identical in cnj, ind, except cnj doesn't require person prefix. keeping them separate for now (see rules referring to these theme signs)
                    %+ThmDir -> "@P.Theme.DirC@" 
                    || %+Cnj _ ] ;
!} cnj theme seed end
